Utah statutes.
13-42-111.    Renewal of registration.
(1)  A provider must obtain a renewal of its registration annually.
(2)  An application for renewal of registration as a provider must be in a
form prescribed by the administrator, signed under penalty of perjury, and:
(a)  be filed no fewer than 30 and no more than 60 days before the
registration expires;
(b)  be accompanied by the fee established by the administrator in accordance
with Section 63J-1-504 and the bond required by Section 13-42-113;
(c)  contain the matter required for initial registration as a provider by
Subsections 13-42-106(8) and (9) and a financial statement, audited by an
accountant licensed to conduct audits, for the applicant's fiscal year
immediately preceding the application;
(d)  disclose any changes in the information contained in the applicant's
application for registration or its immediately previous application for
renewal, as applicable;
(e)  supply evidence of insurance in an amount equal to the larger of $250,000
or the highest daily balance in the trust account required by Section
13-42-122 during the six-month period immediately preceding the application:
(i)  against risks of dishonesty, fraud, theft, and other misconduct on the
part of the applicant or a director, employee, or agent of the applicant;
(ii)  issued by an insurance company authorized to do business in this state
and rated at least A or equivalent by a nationally recognized rating
organization approved by the administrator;
(iii)  with a deductible not exceeding $5,000;
(iv)  payable for the benefit of the applicant, this state, and individuals
who are residents of this state, as their interests may appear; and
(v)  not subject to cancellation by the applicant or the insurer until 60 days
after written notice has been given to the administrator;
(f)  disclose the total amount of money received by the applicant pursuant to
plans during the preceding 12 months from or on behalf of individuals who
reside in this state and the total amount of money distributed to creditors of
those individuals during that period;
(g)  disclose, to the best of the applicant's knowledge, the gross amount of
money accumulated during the preceding 12 months pursuant to plans by or on
behalf of individuals who reside in this state and with whom the applicant has
agreements; and
(h)  provide any other information that the administrator reasonably requires
to perform the administrator's duties under this section.
(3)  Except for the information required by Subsections 13-42-106(7), (14),
and (17) and the addresses required by Subsection 13-42-106(4), the
administrator shall make the information in an application for renewal of
registration as a provider available to the public.
(4)  If a registered provider files a timely and complete application for
renewal of registration, the registration remains effective until the
administrator, in a record, notifies the applicant of a denial and states the
reasons for the denial.
(5)  If the administrator denies an application for renewal of registration as
a provider, the applicant, within 30 days after receiving notice of the
denial, may appeal and request a hearing pursuant to Title 63G, Chapter 4,
Administrative Procedures Act.  Subject to Section 13-42-134, while the appeal
is pending the applicant shall continue to provide debt-management services to
individuals with whom it has agreements.  If the denial is affirmed, subject
to the administrator's order and Section 13-42-134, the applicant shall
continue to provide debt-management services to individuals with whom it has
agreements until, with the approval of the administrator, it transfers the
agreements to another registered provider or returns to the individuals all
unexpended money that is under the applicant's control.
(6) (a)  The administrator may waive or reduce the insurance requirement in
Subsection 13-42-111(1)(e) if the provider does not:
(i)  maintain control of a trust account or receive money paid by an
individual pursuant to a plan for distribution to creditors;
(ii)  make payments to creditors on behalf of individuals;
(iii)  collect fees by means of automatic payment from individuals; and
(iv)  execute any powers of attorney that may be utilized by the provider to
collect fees from or expend funds on behalf of an individual.
(b)  A waiver or reduction in insurance requirements allowed by the
administrator under Subsection (6)(a) shall balance the reduction in risk
posed by a provider meeting the stated requirements against any continued need
for insurance against employee and director dishonesty.
